Washington statutes.
RCW 35.78.050

Use of street and road funds for pedestrian rights-of-way—Standards.

Any city or town may use any funds available for street or road construction, maintenance, or improvement for building, improving, and maintaining a pedestrian right-of-way and for improvements to make existing streets and roads more suitable and safe for pedestrian travel. Any such paths, lanes, roadways, routes, or streets for which any such street or road funds are expended must be suitable for pedestrian travel purposes and not solely for recreation purposes. A pedestrian right-of-way constructed or modified after December 31, 2012, must meet or exceed the standards adopted by the design standards committee under RCW 35.78.030.

[ 2012 c 67 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2012 c 67: See note following RCW 35.75.060.